Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-241
Domestic stock company; change to mutual company; expenses of department; payment by company.

All reasonable expenses incurred by the Department of Insurance shall be certified to by the director and paid by the company.

Laws 1953, c. 152, § 9, p. 484.